California, session 20252026, AB1838.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2011 is added to the Public Contract Code, to read:2011. (a) (1) As a condition of submitting a bid to a local agency for a public works contract, a contractor shall fully disclose any history of wage and hour violations and provide supporting documentation. documentation, as required by this section.(2) To the extent applicable, the contractor shall submit all of the following:(A) A written disclosure of any federal, state, or local wage and hour violations within the past five years, including violations involving unpaid wages, overtime, meal or rest break violations, or misclassification of employees or independent contractors.(B) (i) Documents demonstrating that each disclosed wage and hour violation has been corrected or otherwise resolved. (ii) To the extent applicable, the documentation shall include copies of court orders, judgments, or final administrative determinations, along with proof that all fines, penalties, or back wages have been paid in full. (b) Failure to provide the required disclosures and supporting materials pursuant to this section may result in disqualification of the bid. (c) A local agency shall establish a process that allows a contractor to appeal a bid disqualification for failure to comply with this section and shall ensure that the process complies with all of the following:(1) The process shall include a written notification to the contractor regarding the basis for the contractor’s disqualification and any supporting evidence, including any disclosures submitted to the local agency or adduced as a result of an investigation by the local agency.(2) The contractor shall be given the opportunity to rebut any evidence used as a basis for disqualification and to present evidence to the public entity local agency that supports why the contractor should be found qualified.(3) If the contractor elects to not avail themself of this process, the proposed bid disqualification may be adopted without further proceedings.(d) (1) For purposes of this section, “violation” means a final judgment, order, or determination by a court or any federal, state, or local administrative agency finding the contractor liable for owed wages or related damages, interest, fines, or penalties. (2) A contractor shall not be disqualified for any judgment, order, or determination that is under appeal, provided that the contractor has secured the payment of any amount eventually found due through a bond or other appropriate means.(e) This section shall not apply to either of the following:(1) A public works contract that is covered by a project labor agreement.(2) A project for which a local agency requires contractors, as a condition of bidding, to prequalify by disclosing all wage and hour violations within the past five years, including violations regarding unpaid wages, overtime, meal or rest break requirements, or the misclassification of employees or independent contractors.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.